pl: Mechanizm łóżka wysuwanego: Łóżko kapitańskie; Leżanka; Szuflada; Składane; Wysuwane i podnoszone (pop-up); Wysuwane; Dostawka na kółkach; Wysuwane na kółkach; Wysuwane; Inne
el: Μηχανισμός συρόμενου κρεβατιού: Κρεβάτι καπετάνιου; Ανάκλιντρο; Συρτάρι; Πτυσσόμενο; Αναδυόμενο (με ανύψωση); Συρόμενο; Με ροδάκια; Κυλιόμενο; Συρταρωτό; Άλλο
fi: Varavuodemekanismi: Kapteeninsänky; Vuodesohva; Laatikko; Taitettava; Nostettava (pop-up); Ulosvedettävä; Pyörällinen; Rullattava; Liukuva; Muu
nl: Trundle mechanisme: Kajuitbed; Daybed; Lade; Opvouwbaar; Pop-up (opklapbaar); Uittrekbaar; Verrijdbaar; Uitschuifbaar; Uitschuifbaar; Anders
ro-RO: Mecanismul patului extensibil inferior: Pat cu sertare (Captain's bed); Pat de zi; Sertar; Pliabil; Pop-up (cu ridicare); Extractibil; Rulant; Pe roți; Glisant; Altele
nb: Trinnsengmekanisme: Kapteinsseng; Dagseng; Skuff; Sammenleggbar; Pop-up (løft-opp); Uttrekkbar; Trilleseng; Utrullbar; Utdragbar; Annet
es: Mecanismo de despliegue: Cama capitán; Sofá cama; Cajón; Plegable; Levadizo (pop-up); Extraíble; Con ruedas; Desplazable con ruedas; Deslizante; Otro
hr-HR: Mehanizam za kotačenje: Kapetanski krevet; Dnevni krevet; Ladica; Sklopivo; Pop-up (na podizanje); Na izvlačenje; Na kotrljanje; Na razvlačenje; Klizno; Ostalo
it: Meccanismo di scorrimento: Letto a cassettoni; Daybed; Cassetto; Pieghevole; A scomparsa (sollevabile); Estraibile; Pieghevole su ruote; A estrazione su ruote; Scorrevole; Altro
de: Ausziehmechanismus: Kapitänsbett; Tagesbett; Schublade; Faltbar; Pop-up (hochklappbar); Ausziehbar; Rollbett; Ausrollbar; Schiebeauszug; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 附滾輪床機制: 船長床; 坐臥兩用床; 抽屜; 可折疊; 彈出式 (抬升式); 拉出式; 獨立滾輪式; 滾輪拉出式; 側滑式; 其他
lt-LT: Ratuko mechanizmas: Kapitono lova; Kušetė; Stalčius; Sulankstoma; Pakeliama (iššokanti); Ištraukiama; Išriedanti; Išridenama; Išstumiama; Kita
hu: Görgős mechanizmus: Fiókos ágy; Heverő; Fiók; Összecsukható; Kiemelhető (pop-up); Kihúzható; Gurulós; Kigördíthető; Kicsúsztatható; Egyéb
bg-BG: Механизъм на изтеглящото се легло: Капитанско легло; Кушетка; Чекмедже; Сгъваем; С повдигане (изскачащ); Изтеглящ се; Прибиращ се на колелца; Изваждащ се на колелца; Плъзгащ се; Друг
ko: 트런들 방식: 캡틴 침대; 데이베드; 서랍; 접이식; 팝업(리프트업); 풀아웃; 롤어웨이; 롤아웃; 슬라이드아웃; 기타
fr: Mécanisme du lit gigogne: Lit capitaine; Lit de jour; Tiroir; Pliable; Escamotable (relevable); Extensible; Pliant à roulettes; Sur roulettes; Coulissant; Autre
da: Udtræksmekanisme for gæsteseng: Kaptajnseng; Daybed; Skuffe; Foldbar; Pop-op (lift-up); Udtrækkelig; Sammenklappelig på hjul; Kan rulles ud; Kan skydes ud; Andet
en: Trundle mechanism: Captain's bed; Daybed; Drawer; Foldable; Pop-up (lift-up); Pull-out; Roll-away; Roll-out; Slide-out; Other
vi: Cơ cấu trượt: Giường thuyền trưởng; Giường ban ngày; Ngăn kéo; Có thể gập lại; Bật lên (nâng lên); Kéo ra; Gấp gọn có bánh xe; Lăn ra; Trượt ra; Khác
ru: Механизм выдвижной кровати: Капитанская кровать; Кушетка; Выдвижной ящик; Складной; С подъемным механизмом; Выдвижной; Складной на колесиках; Выкатной; Выдвижной; Другое
sk-SK: Výsuvný mechanizmus: Kapitánska posteľ; Denná posteľ; Zásuvka; Skladací; Vyskakovací (zdvíhací); Vyťahovací; Skladací na kolieskach; Vysúvací; Výsuvný; Iný
ja: トランドルメカニズム: キャプテンベッド; デイベッド; 引き出し式; 折りたたみ式; ポップアップ (リフトアップ); プルアウト; ロールアウェイ; ロールアウト; スライドアウト; その他
pt-PT: Mecanismo da cama auxiliar deslizante: Cama de capitão; Cama de dia; Gaveta; Dobrável; Elevatória (pop-up); Extensível (pull-out); Desdobrável (roll-away); Corrediça (roll-out); Deslizante; Outro
sv: Utdragsmekanism: Kaptenssäng; Dagbädd; Låda; Hopfällbar; Popup (uppfällbar); Utdragbar; Rullbädd; Utrullbar; Utskjutbar; Annat
cs: Výsuvný mechanismus: Kapitánská postel; Denní lůžko; Zásuvka; Skládací; Výklopné (zvedací); Výsuvné; Skládací na kolečkách; Výsuvné na kolečkách; Posuvné; Ostatní
th: กลไกล้อเลื่อน: เตียงกัปตัน; เดย์เบด; ลิ้นชัก; พับได้; ป๊อปอัพ (ยกขึ้น); ดึงออก; ล้อเลื่อน; ม้วนออก; เลื่อนออก; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Mehanizem izvlečne postelje: Kapitanova postelja; Dnevna postelja; Predal; Zložljiv; Dvižni (pop-up); Izvlečni; Zložljiv na kolesih; Na kolescih (izvlečni); Drsni (izvlečni); Drugo
zh-CN: 子床展开机制: 船长床; 坐卧两用床; 抽屉式; 折叠式; 弹出式（提升式）; 抽拉式; 折叠移动式; 滚轮抽出式; 滑出式; 其他
tr: Tekerlekli mekanizma: Kaptan yatağı; Divan yatak; Çekmece; Katlanabilir; Açılır (kaldırmalı); Çekmeli; Tekerlekli katlanır; Tekerlekli çekme; Sürgülü; Diğer
pt-BR: Cama auxiliar mecanismo: Cama capitão; Sofá-cama; Gaveta; Dobrável; Pop-up (elevação); De puxar; De rodízio; De deslizar; Deslizante; Outro